Missouri, session 2026, HB2199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 162.1195, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 162.1195, to read as follows:
162.1195. 1. Beginning in fiscal year 2013, the office of quality schools within the
department of elementary and secondary education may ensure that each regional
professional development center in the state provides professional development educational
assistance for fine arts.
2. The emphasis may include the following:
(1) To act as a resource for school districts under the regional office of professional
development with regard to fine arts education, as delivered by certified arts specialists, and
the integration of the arts into non-arts curricula;
(2) To work with school districts in staff development and curriculum issues related
to fine arts education and fine arts integration;
(3) To collaborate with regional office of professional development personnel and
other regional personnel associated with the regional office of professional development;
(4) To coordinate services available from other entities involved in fine arts education
and fine arts integration;
(5) To assist and support local school districts in providing fine arts education and the
integration of the fine arts; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2199 2
(6) To contribute to the development and implementation of in-service training,
regionally and statewide, which responds to the needs of arts specialists, and other educators
pertaining to the needs of Missouri students in fine arts and the integration of the arts.
3. (1) There is hereby established the "Missouri Music Professional
Development Pilot Program" in the office of quality schools within the department of
elementary and secondary education.
(2) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the department, in conjunction with a
statewide association of Missouri music educators, shall:
(a) Annually provide five workshops to deliver content-specific professional
development to Missouri music educators;
(b) Determine which of the regional professional development centers shall host
the workshops, with each workshop provided at a different center;
(c) Set the date and design the content for each workshop;
(d) Provide moneys from the fund created in subdivision (4) of this subsection
for eligible music educators to attend a workshop;
(e) Monitor the progress of the pilot program; and
(f) Provide all necessary support for the pilot program.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Assess attendance at and costs of the pilot program;
(b) Evaluate participant feedback;
(c) Analyze the value and effectiveness of the pilot program; and
(d) Develop procedures for:
a. Providing moneys for:
(i) Paying a substitute teacher to take the place of a music educator who attends
a workshop during a contracted instructional school day;
(ii) Reimbursing a music educator for mileage expenses for attending a
workshop, with such reimbursement not to exceed thirty-eight cents per mile; and
(iii) Providing moneys to the statewide association of Missouri music educators
to pay an honorarium not to exceed five hundred dollars to a music educator who is a
presenter at a workshop;
b. A school to request reimbursement from the department for substitute
teacher pay and mileage as described in items (i) and (ii) of subparagraph a. of this
paragraph;
c. A statewide association of Missouri music educators to request reimbursement
for honoraria paid to music educators as described in item (iii) of subparagraph a. of
this paragraph;

HB 2199 3
d. The statewide association to provide a completion certificate to a music
educator who attends a workshop so that the music educator can submit the certificate
to the educator's school district and receive professional development credit; and
e. The statewide association to provide a list to the department confirming the
attendance of music educators at workshops and to submit participant evaluations and
responses.
(4) (a) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri Music
Professional Development Pilot Program Fund", which shall consist of moneys
appropriated by the general assembly to such fund. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer
may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for the purposes described in
this subsection.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(c) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
(5) All duties and responsibilities required under this subsection shall be subject
to appropriation.
(6) The department of elementary and secondary education shall terminate the
Missouri music professional development pilot program three years after the effective
date of this subsection. Before January first of the calendar year immediately following
the termination of this program, the department shall submit a report to the general
assembly that contains the results of the pilot program including, but not limited to,
benefits experienced by school districts that employ music educators who participate in
the program.
✔